Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 5 Discharge and Resignation

53-7-50.
Petition by personal representative for discharge; citation and publication; hearing; subsequently discovered estate.

A personal representative who has fully performed all duties or who has been allowed to resign may petition the probate court for discharge from the office and from all liability. The petition shall state that the personal representative has fully administered the estate of the decedent and shall set forth the names and addresses of all known heirs of an intestate decedent or beneficiaries of a testate decedent, including any persons who succeeded to the interest of any heir or beneficiary who died after the decedent died, and shall name which of the heirs or beneficiaries is or should be represented by a guardian. The petition shall state that the personal representative has paid all claims against the estate or shall enumerate which claims of the estate have not been paid and the reason for such nonpayment. The petition shall also state that the personal representative has filed all necessary inventory and returns or, alternatively, has been relieved of such filings by the testator, the heirs or beneficiaries, or the probate court.

Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, upon the filing of a petition for discharge, citation shall issue to all heirs or beneficiaries, as provided in Chapter 11 of this title, requiring them to file any objections to the discharge, except that in all cases a citation shall be published one time in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is filed at least ten days prior to the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed. Any creditors whose claims are disputed or who have not been paid in full due to insolvency of the estate shall be served in accordance with Chapter 11 of this title.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, it shall not be necessary to serve with notice any heir or beneficiary who has relieved the personal representative of all liability or any heir or beneficiary with respect to whom the personal representative has been relieved of all further liability in a binding proceeding such as a settlement of accounts pursuant to Code Sections 53-7-60 through 53-7-63 or an intermediate report pursuant to Code Sections 53-7-73 through 53-7-76.

For purposes of this Code section, a beneficiary is a person, including a trust, who is designated in a will to take an interest in real or personal property and who (A) has a present interest, including but not limited to a vested remainder interest but not including a trust beneficiary where there is a trustee who is not also the personal representative seeking discharge and (B) whose identity and whereabouts are known or may be determined by reasonable diligence. For purposes of this Code section, a trust beneficiary may be represented as provided in Code Section 53-12-8.

If any party in interest files objection to the discharge, a hearing shall be held. If as a result of the hearing, the probate court is satisfied that the personal representative has faithfully and honestly discharged the office, an order shall be entered releasing and discharging the personal representative from all liability. If no objections are filed, the probate court shall enter the order for discharge without further proceedings or delay. Any heir or beneficiary or creditor who is a minor at the time of the discharge and who is not represented by a guardian may, within two years of reaching the age of majority, commence suit against the personal representative and such discharge shall be no bar to the action.

If other property of the estate is discovered after an estate has been settled and the personal representative discharged, the probate court, upon petition of any interested person and upon such service or notice as it directs, may appoint the same personal representative or a successor personal representative to administer the subsequently discovered estate. If a new appointment is made, unless the probate court orders otherwise, the provisions of this title shall apply as appropriate; but no claim previously barred may be asserted in the subsequent administration.

A personal representative may petition the court solely for discharge from office by filing the petition described in subsection (a) of this Code section and by serving notice by publication one time in the official county newspaper and by first-class mail to all creditors of the estate whose claims have not been paid informing them of their right to file an objection and be heard as described in subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 23; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 35; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 4; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-44/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “service with notice” for “notify” in paragraph (b)(2); added the last sentence in paragraph (b)(3); inserted “service or” in the first sentence in subsection (d); and substituted “serving notice” for “giving notice” in subsection (e).

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Ewing v. Moses,

50 Ga. 264

(1873).

Law reviews.

For article discussing methods of simplifying the administration of estates by excusing the executors from certain obligations, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-7-51.
Discharge when funds unclaimed.

If funds are in the hands of the personal representative and no person claims such funds, the probate court may nevertheless grant a discharge.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 36.

53-7-52.
Discharge of temporary administrator.

A temporary administrator may be discharged in the same manner as provided for discharge of personal representatives.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-53.
Discharge obtained by fraud.

A discharge obtained by the personal representative by means of any fraud is void and may be set aside on motion and proof of fraud.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-54.
Breach of fiduciary duty.

If a personal representative or temporary administrator commits a breach of fiduciary duty or threatens to commit a breach of fiduciary duty, a beneficiary of a testate estate or heir of an intestate estate shall have a cause of action:

To recover damages;

To compel the performance of the personal representative’s or temporary administrator’s duties;

To enjoin the commission of a breach of fiduciary duty;

To compel the redress of a breach of fiduciary duty by payment of money or otherwise;

To appoint another personal representative or temporary administrator to take possession of the estate property and administer the estate;

To remove the personal representative or temporary administrator; and

To reduce or deny compensation to the personal representative or temporary administrator.

When estate assets are misapplied and can be traced in the hands of persons affected with notice of misapplication, a constructive trust shall attach to the assets.

The provision of remedies for breach of fiduciary duty by this Code section does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

In any action or proceeding brought pursuant to this Code section, service of notice or process shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title if Chapter 11 of this title is applicable under Code Section 53-11-1. If Chapter 11 of this title is not applicable to such action or proceeding under Code Section 53-11-1, such service shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of Title 9 unless Chapter 11 of such title is not applicable to such action or proceeding under Code Section 9-11-81.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-45/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “constructive” in subsection (b); and added subsection (d).

53-7-55.
Revocation of letters of personal representative or other sanctions.

Upon the petition of any person having an interest in the estate or whenever it appears to the probate court that good cause may exist to revoke the letters of a personal representative or impose other sanctions, the court shall cite the personal representative to answer to the charge. Upon investigation, the court may, in the court’s discretion:

Revoke the personal representative’s letters;

Require additional security;

Require the personal representative to appear and submit to a settlement of accounts following the procedure set forth in Article 6 of this chapter, regardless of whether the personal representative has first resigned or been removed and regardless of whether a successor fiduciary has been appointed; or

Issue such other order as in the court’s judgment is appropriate under the circumstances of the case.

In any proceeding brought pursuant to this Code section, service of notice shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-46/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); in paragraph (a)(3), substituted “regardless of whether” for “whether or not” twice; and added subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

53-7-56.
Resignation.

A personal representative may resign:

In the manner and under the circumstances described in the will;

Upon petition to the probate court, showing that the resignation has been requested in writing by all heirs of an intestate estate or all beneficiaries of a testate estate; or

Upon petition to the probate court, showing to the satisfaction of the court that:

The personal representative is unable to continue serving due to age, illness, infirmity, or other good cause;

Greater burdens have developed upon the office of personal representative than those that originally were contemplated or should have been contemplated when the personal representative was qualified and the additional burdens would work a hardship upon the personal representative;

Disagreement exists between one or more of the beneficiaries or heirs and the personal representative in respect to the personal representative’s management of the estate, which disagreement and conflict appear deleterious to the estate;

The resignation of the personal representative will result in or permit substantial financial benefit to the estate;

The resigning personal representative is one of two or more acting personal representatives and the other personal representatives will continue in office with no adversity to the estate contemplated; or

The resignation would not be disadvantageous to the estate.

A personal representative’s petition to resign shall be made to the probate court and the court shall cause citation to issue and service of notice to be made upon all the heirs of an intestate estate or the beneficiaries of a testate estate in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-47/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “that originally were” for “which were originally” in subparagraph (a)(3)(B); and, in subsection (b), substituted “the court shall cause citation to issue and service of notice to” for “service shall” and inserted “in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title” at the end.